Washington statutes.
RCW 43.80.100

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1) "Bond" has the meaning given in RCW 39.46.020.

(2) "Fiscal agent contract" means the contract entered into by the state finance committee with each designated fiscal agent, as provided in RCW 43.80.120.

(3) "Local government" has the meaning given in RCW 39.46.020.

(4) "Obligation" has the meaning given in RCW 39.46.020.

(5) "State" has the meaning given in RCW 39.46.020.

(6) "State fiscal agents" means those banks or trust companies designated as provided in RCW 43.80.120.

(7) "Treasurer" has the meaning given in RCW 39.46.020.

[ 2016 c 105 s 1; 1984 c 7 s 48; 1969 ex.s. c 80 s 1.]